Louisiana, session 2026, HB236.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 46:1057 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1057. Duties of director
A. In addition to the duties imposed upon him by other provisions of this
Chapter, it shall be the duty of the director to do all of the following:
(1) To attend all meetings of the commission and to act as secretary and keep
the official minutes of the proceedings.
(2) With the consent of the commissioners, and To, subject to such
budgetary limitations and any civil service laws in effect, the director shall have
power to establish positions and to make appointments thereto; to establish rates of
pay; to abolish positions; to transfer duties among positions; to assign duties to,
direct and control the work of, and transfer, promote, demote, remove and remove,
or otherwise change the status of employees of the district.
(3) To make and publish such reports regarding the work of the district as
may be required by law, or which he may be directed to make by the commission.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-599 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 236
(4) To see that the policies relating to the conduct of the affairs of the district
which have been established by the commission are carried out.
(5) To cooperate with the medical staff in the performance of the policies
which it may establish.
(6) To prepare an annual budget for approval by the commission and the
police jury.
(7) To recommend to the commission the scale of rates to be charged for
services rendered by the district.
(8) To provide for adequate medical records and reports.
(9) To control and direct all business affairs of the district. By way of
extension and not of limitation, these duties shall include the keeping of the accounts
of the district, making necessary purchase of equipment, supplies, and materials, and
making major and minor repairs to physical facilities.
(10) To receive and receipt for and keep a correct accounting of all gifts,
bequests, grants-in-aid, and other revenues received by the district and, with the
consent of the commission, to expend the proceeds of all such gifts, bequests, grants-
in-aid, and other revenues for the purpose purposes designated in this Chapter and
subject to any conditions that may be imposed in any act of donation or any law
providing grants-in-aid or other revenues for such purpose.
(11) To perform any other duties and functions which he or the commission
consider necessary or desirable to carry out the purposes of this Chapter.
(B) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the director has exclusive
control over all executive functions and general operations of the district.